it: Materiale delle corde del tamburo parlante: Aramide (Kevlar®); Cotone; Canapa; Iuta; Pelle; Nylon; Poliestere; Altro
el: Υλικό καλωδίου τυμπάνου με ομιλία: Αραμίδιο (Kevlar®); Βαμβάκι; Κάνναβη; Γιούτα; Δέρμα; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Άλλο
cs: Materiál šňůry pro mluvící buben: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bavlna; Konopí; Juta; Kůže; Nylon; Polyester; Jiné
sl-SI: Material vrvice za govoreči boben: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bombaž; Konoplja; Juta; Usnje; Najlon; Poliester; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на кордите на говорещия барабан: Арамид (Kevlar®); Памук; Коноп; Юта; Кожа; Найлон; Полиестер; Друго
nl: Talking drum koordmateriaal: Aramide (Kevlar®); Katoen; Hennep; Jute; Leer; Nylon; Polyester; Overig
nb: Snormateriale for klemtromme: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bomull; Hamp; Jute; Lær; Nylon; Polyester; Annet
pt-BR: Tambor falante material dos cordões: Aramida (Kevlar®); Algodão; Cânhamo; Juta; Couro; Nylon; Poliéster; Outro
en: Talking drum cord material: Aramid (Kevlar®); Cotton; Hemp; Jute; Leather; Nylon; Polyester; Other
vi: Vật liệu dây trống nói: Aramid (Kevlar®); Cotton; Gai dầu; Đay; Da; Nylon; Polyester; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál šnúry hovoriaceho bubna: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bavlna; Konope; Juta; Koža; Nylon; Polyester; Iné
pl: Materiał sznurka bębna gadającego: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bawełna; Konopie; Juta; Skóra; Nylon; Poliester; Inne
tr: Konuşan davul kordon malzemesi: Aramid (Kevlar®); Pamuk; Kenevir; Jüt; Deri; Naylon; Polyester; Diğer
ro-RO: Materialul corzilor tobei vorbitoare: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bumbac; Cânepă; Iută; Piele; Nailon; Poliester; Altele
hr-HR: Materijal za žicu bubnja za govor: Aramid (Kevlar®); Pamuk; Konoplja; Juta; Koža; Najlon; Poliester; Ostalo
zh-TW: 說話鼓繩索材質: 芳綸 (Kevlar®); 棉; 漢麻; 黃麻; 皮革; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 其他
ja: トーキングドラム張力コード素材: アラミド (ケブラー®); 綿; ヘンプ; ジュート; レザー; ナイロン; ポリエステル; その他
lt-LT: Talking drum virvelių medžiaga: Aramidinis pluoštas („Kevlar®“); Medvilnė; Kanapinis pluoštas; Džiutas; Oda; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Kita
sv: Material till talande trummans rep: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bomull; Hampa; Jute; Läder; Nylon; Polyester; Annat
fi: Talking drum -rummun nyörin materiaali: Aramidi (Kevlar®); Puuvilla; Hamppu; Juutti; Nahka; Nailon; Polyesteri; Muu
zh-CN: 说话鼓拉绳材质: 芳纶 (Kevlar®); 棉; 大麻纤维; 黄麻; 皮革; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 其他
fr: Matériau des cordes du tambour parlant: Aramide (Kevlar®); Coton; Chanvre; Jute; Cuir; Nylon; Polyester; Autre
es: Material para cuerdas del tambor parlante: Aramida (Kevlar®); Algodón; Cáñamo; Yute; Cuero; Nailon; Poliéster; Otro
ko: 토킹 드럼 장력 끈 소재: 아라미드(Kevlar®); 면; 삼베; 황마; 가죽; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 기타
th: วัสดุเชือกกลองพูดได้: อะรามิด (Kevlar®); ฝ้าย; ใยกัญชง; ปอกระเจา; หนัง; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; อื่นๆ
da: Snoremateriale til talking drum: Aramid (Kevlar®); Bomuld; Hamp; Jute; Læder; Nylon; Polyester; Andet
pt-PT: Material dos cordões do tambor falante: Aramida (Kevlar®); Algodão; Cânhamo; Juta; Pele; Nylon; Poliéster; Outro
hu: Beszélő dob zsinórjának anyaga: Aramid (Kevlar®); Pamut; Kender; Juta; Bőr; Nejlon; Poliészter; Egyéb
ru: Материал шнуров говорящего барабана: Арамид (Kevlar®); Хлопок; Пенька; Джут; Кожа; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Другое
de: Material der Talking-Drum-Spannschnüre: Aramid (Kevlar®); Baumwolle; Hanf; Jute; Leder; Nylon; Polyester; Sonstige